Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2404.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 5, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-503.05, to read: START_STATUTE36-503.05. Mental health patients; proposed patients; transportation; use of peace officers prohibited; exceptions A. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, A peace officer may not conduct the transport of a person from a hospital emergency department or a locked unit of a behavioral health facility to another health care institution, an evaluation agency or a mental health treatment agency, unless one of the following applies: 1. The person is incarcerated. 2. A court, a person, an evaluation agency or a mental health treatment agency has reasonable grounds to believe that the patient or proposed patient cannot be safely apprehended without the assistance of a peace officer. 3. Any person requests a peace officer by dialing 911 or a similar designated telephone number for emergency calls and needs emergency assistance. B. Except as provided in subsection A of this section, an authorized transporter shall conduct any apprehension and transport of a patient or proposed patient. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Effective date Section 36-503.05, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, is effective from and after December 31, 2029. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.